en: Equipment contact material (brew/wine): Aluminum; Ceramic; Copper; Food-grade HDPE; Food-grade PET; Glass; Plastic; Rubber; Silicone; Stainless steel; Wood; Other
th: วัสดุสัมผัสอุปกรณ์ (เบียร์/ไวน์): อะลูมิเนียม; เซรามิก; ทองแดง; HDPE เกรดอาหาร; PET เกรดอาหาร; แก้ว; พลาสติก; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ja: 機器接触素材（ビール／ワイン）: アルミニウム; セラミック; 銅; 食品グレードのHDPE; 食品グレードのPET; ガラス; プラスチック; ラバー; シリコン; ステンレススチール; 木材; その他
lt-LT: Įrangos kontaktinė medžiaga (alus / vynas): Aliuminis; Keramika; Varis; Maistinis HDPE; Maistinis PET; Stiklas; Plastikas; Guma; Silikonas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Mediena; Kita
nb: Kontaktmateriale for utstyr (brygging/vin): Aluminium; Keramikk; Kobber; Næringsmiddelgodkjent HDPE; Næringsmiddelgodkjent PET; Glass; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Rustfritt stål; Tre; Annet
cs: Materiál, ze kterého je vyrobeno zařízení přicházející do kontaktu s potravinami (pivo/víno): Hliník; Keramika; Měď; Potravinářský HDPE; Potravinářský PET; Sklo; Plast; Guma; Silikon; Nerezová ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
pt-BR: Material em contato com o equipamento (cerveja/vinho): Alumínio; Cerâmica; Cobre; PEAD de grau alimentício; PET de grau alimentício; Vidro; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál, ktorý prichádza do styku s nápojmi (pivo/víno): Hliník; Keramika; Meď; Potravinárske HDPE; Potravinárske PET; Sklo; Plast; Guma; Silikón; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Drevo; Iné
da: Materialer i kontakt med produktet (øl/vin): Aluminium; Keramik; Kobber; Fødevaregodkendt HDPE; Fødevaregodkendt PET; Glas; Plast; Gummi; Silikone; Rustfrit stål; Træ; Andet
hu: Berendezésekkel érintkező anyag (sör/bor): Alumínium; Kerámia; Réz; Élelmiszer-ipari HDPE; Élelmiszer-ipari PET; Üveg; Műanyag; Gumi; Szilikon; Rozsdamentes acél; Fa; Egyéb
zh-CN: 设备接触材料（啤酒/葡萄酒）: 铝; 陶瓷; 铜; 食品级 HDPE; 食品级 PET; 玻璃; 塑料; 橡胶; 硅胶; 不锈钢; 木材; 其他
pl: Materiał stykający się ze sprzętem (browar/wino): Aluminium; Ceramika; Miedź; HDPE dopuszczony do kontaktu z żywnością; PET dopuszczony do kontaktu z żywnością; Szkło; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Silikon; Stal nierdzewna; Drewno; Inne
zh-TW: 設備接液材質 (啤酒/葡萄酒): 鋁; 陶瓷; 銅; 食品級 HDPE; 食品級 PET; 玻璃; 塑膠; 橡膠; 矽膠; 不鏽鋼; 木材; 其他
it: Materiale a contatto con le attrezzature (birra/vino): Alluminio; Ceramica; Rame; HDPE per uso alimentare; PET per uso alimentare; Vetro; Plastica; Gomma; Silicone; Acciaio inossidabile; Legno; Altro
nl: Contactmateriaal van uitrusting (brouwen/wijn): Aluminium; Keramiek; Koper; Voedselveilig HDPE; Voedselveilig PET; Glas; Plastic; Rubber; Siliconen; Roestvrij staal; Hout; Overig
pt-PT: Material em contacto com o equipamento (cerveja/vinho): Alumínio; Cerâmica; Cobre; HDPE de grau alimentar; PET de grau alimentar; Vidro; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
fi: Laitteiden kosketusmateriaali (panimo/viininvalmistus): Alumiini; Keramiikka; Kupari; Elintarvikekäyttöön sopiva HDPE; Elintarvikekäyttöön sopiva PET; Lasi; Muovi; Kumi; Silikoni; Ruostumaton teräs; Puu; Muu
ru: Материал, контактирующий с продуктом (пиво/вино): Алюминий; Керамика; Медь; Пищевой HDPE; Пищевой PET; Стекло; Пластик; Резина; Силикон; Нержавеющая сталь; Дерево; Другое
sv: Kontaktmaterial för utrustning (bryggning/vin): Aluminium; Keramik; Koppar; Livsmedelsgodkänd HDPE; Livsmedelsgodkänd PET; Glas; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Rostfritt stål; Trä; Annat
es: Material en contacto con el equipo (cerveza/vino): Aluminio; Cerámica; Cobre; HDPE de grado alimenticio; PET de grado alimenticio; Vidrio; Plástico; Caucho; Silicona; Acero inoxidable; Madera; Otro
el: Υλικό επαφής εξοπλισμού (ζυθοποιία/κρασί): Αλουμίνιο; Κεραμικό; Χαλκός; HDPE για τρόφιμα; PET για τρόφιμα; Γυαλί; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ξύλο; Άλλο
ko: 장비 접촉 재질(양조/와인 제조용): 알루미늄; 세라믹; 구리; 식품용 HDPE; 식품용 PET; 유리; 플라스틱; 고무; 실리콘; 스테인리스 스틸; 나무; 기타
sl-SI: Material opreme v stiku s pijačo (pivo/vino): Aluminij; Keramika; Baker; HDPE za živila; PET za živila; Steklo; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Nerjavno jeklo; Les; Drugo
ro-RO: Material de contact cu echipamentul (bere/vin): Aluminiu; Ceramică; Cupru; HDPE de uz alimentar; PET de uz alimentar; Sticlă; Plastic; Cauciuc; Silicon; Oțel inoxidabil; Lemn; Altele
vi: Vật liệu tiếp xúc của thiết bị (bia/rượu): Nhôm; Gốm; Đồng; HDPE cấp thực phẩm; PET cấp thực phẩm; Thủy tinh; Nhựa; Cao su; Silicone; Thép không gỉ; Gỗ; Khác
hr-HR: Materijal za kontakt s opremom (pivo/vino): Aluminij; Keramika; Bakar; Prehrambeni HDPE; Prehrambeni PET; Staklo; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Nehrđajući čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
tr: Ekipmanla temas eden malzeme (bira/şarap): Alüminyum; Seramik; Bakır; Gıdaya uygun HDPE; Gıdaya uygun PET; Cam; Plastik; Kauçuk; Silikon; Paslanmaz çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
de: Gerätekontaktmaterial (Brauerei/Wein): Aluminium; Keramik; Kupfer; Lebensmittelechtes HDPE; Lebensmittelechtes PET; Glas; Kunststoff; Gummi; Silikon; Edelstahl; Holz; Sonstige
bg-BG: Материал на контактните повърхности на оборудването (за бира/вино): Алуминий; Керамика; Мед; HDPE за хранителни цели; PET за хранителни цели; Стъкло; Пластмаса; Гума; Силикон; Неръждаема стомана; Дърво; Друго
fr: Matériau en contact avec le liquide pour le brassage ou la vinification: Aluminium; Céramique; Cuivre; HDPE de qualité alimentaire; PET de qualité alimentaire; Verre; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Acier inoxydable; Bois; Autre